New York, session 2025-2026, A4740.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subparagraphs (x) and (xi) of paragraph (b) of subdivision 2 1 of section 150.20 of the criminal procedure law, as added by section 1 3 of subpart B of part UU of chapter 56 of the laws of 2022, are amended 4 and a new subparagraph (xii) is added to read as follows: 5 (x) the person is eighteen years of age or older and charged with a 6 hate crime as defined in section 485.05 of the penal law; [or] 7 (xi) the offense is a qualifying offense pursuant to paragraph (t) of 8 subdivision four of section 510.10 of this chapter, or pursuant to para- 9 graph (t) of subdivision four of section 530.40 of this chapter[.]; or 10 (xii) the person is charged with a crime for which the court may order 11 the posting of a security pursuant to subdivision six of section three 12 hundred seventy-three of the agriculture and markets law. 13 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD08278-01-5